Missouri, session 2026, SB1717.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 487.020, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 487.020,
to read as follows:
487.020. 1. In each circuit or a county having a
family court, a majority of the circuit and associate
circuit judges en banc, in the circuit, may appoint
commissioners, subject to appropriations, to hear family
court cases and make findings as provided for in sections
487.010 to 487.190. Any person serving as a commissioner of
the juvenile division of the circuit court on August 28,
1993, shall become a commissioner of the family court. In
each circuit or a county therein having a family court, a
majority of the circuit and associate circuit judges en banc
may appoint, in addition to those commissioners serving as
commissioners of the juvenile division and becoming
commissioners of the family court pursuant to the provisions
of sections 487.020 to 487.040, no more than three
additional commissioners to hear family court cases and make
findings and recommendations as provided in sections 487.010
to 487.190. The number of additional commissioners added as

SB 1717 2
a result of the provisions of sections 487.010 to 487.190
may be appointed only to the extent that the state is
reimbursed for the salaries of the commissioners as provided
in sections 487.010 to 487.190 or by federal or county funds
or by gifts or grants made for such purposes. A
commissioner shall be appointed for a term of four years.
Commissioners appointed pursuant to sections 487.020 to
487.040 shall serve in addition to circuit judges, associate
circuit court judges and commissioners authorized to hear
actions classified under section 487.080.
2. The circuit courts in the seventh judicial circuit,
eleventh judicial circuit, the thirteenth judicial circuit,
and the thirty-first judicial circuit may, in substitution
of each family court commissioner currently appointed
pursuant to this section whose salary is reimbursable,
appoint a family court commissioner whose compensation shall
be payable by the state without necessity of reimbursement.
The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to
allow appointment of a family court commissioner in the
eleventh judicial circuit in addition to the number of such
family court commissioners holding office in the eleventh
judicial circuit as of January 1, 1999. The provisions of
this subsection shall not be construed to allow appointment
of a family court commissioner in the thirteenth judicial
circuit or the thirty-first judicial circuit in addition to
the number of such family court commissioners holding office
in such circuits as of January 1, 2013. The provisions of
this subsection shall not be construed to allow appointment
of a family court commissioner in the seventh judicial
circuit in addition to the number of such family court
commissioners holding office in the seventh judicial circuit
as of January 1, 2027. The appointment of the state-paid

SB 1717 3
commissioner shall be subject to appropriations for such
purpose.
3. Each commissioner of the family court shall possess
the same qualifications as a circuit judge. The
compensation and retirement benefits of each commissioner
shall be the same as that of an associate circuit judge,
payable in the same manner and from the same source as that
of an associate circuit judge.
✓